Tennessee, session 114, SB0409.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 8-21-401(b)(2)(B), is amended by
deleting "one hundred dollars ($100)" and substituting "one hundred twenty-five dollars ($125)".
SECTION 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2025, the public welfare requiring it.
SB0409
001777
- 1 -